Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.075

Office of financial management—Certain personnel exempted from chapter.

In addition to the exemptions set forth in RCW 41.06.070, the provisions of this chapter shall not apply in the office of financial management to the director, his or her confidential secretary, not to exceed two deputy directors and not to exceed seven assistant directors.

[ 2012 c 117 s 9; 1979 c 151 s 56; 1969 ex.s. c 239 s 7.]

NOTES:

Office of financial management: Chapter 43.41 RCW.